Indiana, session 2026, HB1323.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 35-33-8-3.2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.205-2023,
SECTION 30, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3.2. (a) After considering the results of the Indiana
pretrial risk assessment system (if available), other relevant factors, and
bail guidelines described in section sections 3.8 and 4 of this chapter,
a court may admit a defendant to bail and impose any of the following
conditions to assure the defendant's appearance at any stage of the legal
proceedings, or, upon a showing of clear and convincing evidence that
the defendant poses a risk of physical danger to another person or the
community, to assure the public's physical safety:
(1) Require the defendant to:
(A) execute a bail bond with sufficient solvent sureties;
(B) deposit cash or securities in an amount equal to the bail;
(C) execute a bond secured by real estate in the county, where
thirty-three hundredths (0.33) of the true tax value less
encumbrances is at least equal to the amount of the bail;
(D) post a real estate bond; or
2026 IN 1323—LS 6319/DI 107


(E) perform any combination of the requirements described in
clauses (A) through (D).
If the court requires the defendant to deposit cash or cash and
another form of security as bail, the court may require the
defendant and each person who makes the deposit on behalf of the
defendant to execute an agreement that allows the court to retain
all or a part of the cash to pay publicly paid costs of
representation and fines, costs, fees, and restitution that the court
may order the defendant to pay if the defendant is convicted.
Before execution of the agreement, the defendant or person who
makes the deposit on behalf of the defendant shall be advised that,
upon conviction of the defendant, the court may retain from the
cash deposited as bail all or a part of the cash to pay publicly paid
costs of representation and fines, costs, fees, and restitution that
the court may order the defendant to pay if the defendant is
convicted. The defendant must also pay the fee required by
subsection (d).
(2) Require the defendant to execute:
(A) a bail bond by depositing cash or securities with the clerk
of the court in an amount not less than ten percent (10%) of
the bail; and
(B) an agreement that allows the court to retain all or a part of
the cash or securities to pay fines, costs, fees, and restitution
that the court may order the defendant to pay if the defendant
is convicted.
A portion of the deposit, not to exceed ten percent (10%) of the
monetary value of the deposit or fifty dollars ($50), whichever is
the lesser amount, may be retained as an administrative fee. The
clerk shall also retain from the deposit under this subdivision
fines, costs, fees, and restitution as ordered by the court, publicly
paid costs of representation that shall be disposed of in
accordance with subsection (b), and the fee required by
subsection (d). In the event of the posting of a real estate bond,
the bond shall be used only to insure the presence of the
defendant at any stage of the legal proceedings, but shall not be
foreclosed for the payment of fines, costs, fees, or restitution. The
individual posting bail for the defendant or the defendant
admitted to bail under this subdivision must be notified by the
sheriff, court, or clerk that the defendant's deposit may be
forfeited under section 7 of this chapter or retained under
subsection (b).
(3) Impose reasonable restrictions on the activities, movements,
2026 IN 1323—LS 6319/DI 107


associations, and residence of the defendant during the period of
release.
(4) Except as provided in section 3.6 of this chapter, require the
defendant to refrain from any direct or indirect contact with an
individual and, if the defendant has been charged with an offense
under IC 35-46-3, any animal belonging to the individual,
including if the defendant has not been released from lawful
detention.
(5) Place the defendant under the reasonable supervision of a
probation officer, pretrial services agency, or other appropriate
public official. If the court places the defendant under the
supervision of a probation officer or pretrial services agency, the
court shall determine whether the defendant must pay the pretrial
services fee under section 3.3 of this chapter.
(6) Release the defendant into the care of a qualified person or
organization responsible for supervising the defendant and
assisting the defendant in appearing in court. The supervisor shall
maintain reasonable contact with the defendant in order to assist
the defendant in making arrangements to appear in court and,
where appropriate, shall accompany the defendant to court. The
supervisor need not be financially responsible for the defendant.
(7) Release the defendant on personal recognizance unless:
(A) the state presents evidence relevant to a risk by the
defendant:
(i) of nonappearance; or
(ii) to the physical safety of the public; and
(B) the court finds by a preponderance of the evidence that the
risk exists.
(8) Require a defendant charged with an offense under IC 35-46-3
to refrain from owning, harboring, or training an animal.
(9) Require a defendant to participate in a mental health referral
program under IC 33-23-18.
(10) Impose any other reasonable restrictions designed to assure
the defendant's presence in court or the physical safety of another
person or the community.
(b) Within thirty (30) days after disposition of the charges against
the defendant, the court that admitted the defendant to bail shall order
the clerk to remit the amount of the deposit remaining under subsection
(a)(2) to the person who made the deposit. The portion of the deposit
that is not remitted to the person who made the deposit shall be
deposited by the clerk in the supplemental public defender services
fund established under IC 33-40-3.
2026 IN 1323—LS 6319/DI 107


(c) For purposes of subsection (b), "disposition" occurs when the
indictment or information is dismissed or the defendant is acquitted or
convicted of the charges.
(d) Except as provided in subsection (e), the clerk of the court shall:
(1) collect a fee of five dollars ($5) from each bond or deposit
required under subsection (a)(1); and
(2) retain a fee of five dollars ($5) from each deposit under
subsection (a)(2).
The clerk of the court shall semiannually remit the fees collected under
this subsection to the board of trustees of the Indiana public retirement
system for deposit in the special death benefit fund. The fee required
by subdivision (2) is in addition to the administrative fee retained under
subsection (a)(2).
(e) With the approval of the clerk of the court, the county sheriff
may collect the bail posted under this section. The county sheriff shall
remit the bail to the clerk of the court by the following business day
and remit monthly the five dollar ($5) special death benefit fee to the
county auditor.
(f) When a court imposes a condition of bail described in subsection
(a)(4):
(1) the clerk of the court shall comply with IC 5-2-9; and
(2) the prosecuting attorney shall file a confidential form
prescribed or approved by the office of judicial administration
with the clerk.
(g) The clerk of the court shall record the name, address, and bail
agent license number, if applicable, of the bail agent or a person
authorized by the surety posting bail for the defendant in the county
court electronic case management system.
SECTION 2. IC 35-33-8-3.8, AS ADDED BY P.L.187-2017,
SECTION 7, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3.8. (a) A court shall consider the results of the
Indiana pretrial risk assessment system (if available) before setting or
modifying bail for an arrestee.
(b) If the court finds, based on the results of the Indiana pretrial risk
assessment system (if available) and other relevant factors, that an
arrestee does not present a substantial risk of flight or danger to the
arrestee or others, the court shall consider releasing release the arrestee
without money bail or surety, subject to restrictions and conditions as
determined by the court, unless one (1) or more of the following apply:
(1) The arrestee is charged with murder or treason.
(2) The arrestee is on pretrial release not related to the incident
that is the basis for the present arrest.
2026 IN 1323—LS 6319/DI 107


(3) The arrestee is on probation, parole, or other community
supervision.
The court is not required to administer an assessment before releasing
an arrestee if administering the assessment will delay the arrestee's
release.
SECTION 3. IC 35-33-8-3.9, AS ADDED BY P.L.187-2017,
SECTION 8, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3.9. (a) If the court determines that an arrestee is
to be held subject to money bail, the court is authorized, subject to
section 4 of this chapter, to determine the amount of bail and whether
the bail may be satisfied by surety bond or cash deposit.
(b) The court may set and accept a partial cash payment of the bail
upon conditions set by the court, including the arrestee's agreement
(and the agreement of a person who makes a cash payment on behalf
of an arrestee, if applicable) that all court costs, fees, and expenses
associated with the proceeding shall be paid from the partial payment.
(c) If the court authorizes the acceptance of a cash partial payment
to satisfy bail, the court shall first secure the arrestee's agreement (and
the agreement of a person who makes a cash payment on behalf of an
arrestee, if applicable) that, in the event of failure to appear as
scheduled, the deposit shall be forfeited and the arrestee must also pay
any additional amounts needed to satisfy the full amount of bail plus
associated court costs, fees, and expenses.
SECTION 4. IC 35-33-8-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.187-2017,
SECTION 9, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. (a) The court shall order the amount in which
a person charged by an indictment or information is to be held to bail,
and the clerk shall enter the order on the order book and indorse the
amount on each warrant when issued. If no order fixing the amount of
bail has been made, the sheriff shall present the warrant to the judge of
an appropriate court of criminal jurisdiction, and the judge shall
indorse on the warrant the amount of bail.
(b) Bail may not shall be set higher than that at the lowest amount
reasonably required to assure the defendant's appearance in court or to
assure the physical safety of another person or the community, based
on the defendant's financial circumstances, and may be imposed
only if the court finds setting bail is necessary to assure the
defendant's appearance in court or if the court finds by clear and
convincing evidence that the defendant poses a risk to the physical
safety of another person or the community. In setting and accepting an
amount of bail, the judicial officer shall consider the bail guidelines
described in section 3.8 of this chapter and take into account all facts
2026 IN 1323—LS 6319/DI 107


relevant to the risk of nonappearance, including:
(1) the length and character of the defendant's residence in the
community;
(2) the defendant's employment status and history and the
defendant's ability to give bail;
(3) the defendant's family ties and relationships;
(4) the defendant's character, reputation, habits, and mental
condition;
(5) the defendant's criminal or juvenile record, insofar as it
demonstrates instability and a disdain for the court's authority to
bring the defendant to trial;
(6) the defendant's previous record in not responding to court
appearances when required or with respect to flight to avoid
criminal prosecution;
(7) the nature and gravity of the offense and the potential penalty
faced, insofar as these factors are relevant to the risk of
nonappearance;
(8) the source of funds or property to be used to post bail or to pay
a premium, insofar as it affects the risk of nonappearance;
(9) that the defendant is a foreign national who is unlawfully
present in the United States under federal immigration law; and
(10) any other factors, including any evidence of instability and
a disdain for authority, which might indicate that the defendant
might not recognize and adhere to the authority of the court to
bring the defendant to trial.
2026 IN 1323—LS 6319/DI 107